New Jersey, session 222, A2569.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         As used in this section, military science means instruction authorized pursuant to the Junior Reserve Officers Training Corps established pursuant to 10 U.S.C. s.2031. b.    The State Board of Education shall authorize a revised military science endorsement to the standard certificate.  The endorsement shall authorize the holder to teach military science to students in grades nine through 12. c.     In order to be eligible for the military science endorsement established pursuant to subsection b. of this section, a candidate shall: (1)   document 10 years of military service; and (2)   hold a valid certification authorizing employment as a military science instructor from the branch of service in which the candidate served. d.    To retain this endorsement, the holder shall maintain the authorization required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection c. of this section. 2.    The State Board of Education shall adopt, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.